Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2792.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LEGAL FEES.new text end new text begin $900,000 in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated from the general fund to the Campaign Finance and Public Disclosure Board if an order granting plaintiff's motion for fees and expenses is filed in Minnesota Chamber of Commerce v. Choi (23-CV-02015). The Campaign Finance and Public Disclosure Board must pay, on behalf of all defendants, all fees and expenses awarded to the plaintiff. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. new text end